Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2709.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 2.92, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Limitations. This section does not prohibit: (1) denial of admittance into a particular apartment, room, manufactured home, or personal residential unit; (2) in the case of a nursing home or an assisted living facility licensed under chapter 144G, denial of permission to visit certain persons for valid health reasons; (3) limiting visits to a reasonable number of census employees or reasonable hoursnew text begin , provided that access must be permitted during the hours of 10 a.m. through 8:00 p.m. on any day, at a minimumnew text end ; (4) requiring deleted text begin a prior appointmentdeleted text end new text begin 24 hours prior noticenew text end to gain access to the facility; or (5) denial of admittance to or expulsion of an individual employee from a multiple unit dwelling for good cause. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 2.92, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Notice to residents. new text end new text begin The owner, manager, or operator of a multiple unit dwelling is encouraged to notify residents of the days on which a census worker has provided notice of an intent to be present. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 211B.20, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Exceptions. Subdivision 1 does not prohibit: (1) denial of admittance into a particular apartment, room, manufactured home, or personal residential unit; (2) requiring reasonable and proper identification as a necessary prerequisite to admission to a multiple unit dwelling; (3) in the case of a nursing home or an assisted living facility under chapter 144G, denial of permission to visit certain persons for valid health reasons; (4) limiting visits by candidates or volunteers accompanied by the candidate to a reasonable number of persons or reasonable hoursnew text begin , provided that access must be permitted during the hours of 10 a.m. through 8:00 p.m. on any day, at a minimumnew text end ; (5) requiring deleted text begin a prior appointmentdeleted text end new text begin 24 hours prior noticenew text end to gain access to the facility; or (6) denial of admittance to or expulsion from a multiple unit dwelling for good cause. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 211B.20, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Notice to residents. new text end new text begin The owner, manager, or operator of a multiple unit dwelling is encouraged to notify residents of the days on which a candidate has provided notice of an intent to be present. new text end